test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V_1а_Perf_прочитать_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - прочитать : # Verb - full paradigm
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Inf: прочитать
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+Msc+Sg: прочитал
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+Neu+Sg: прочитало
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+Fem+Sg: прочитала
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+MFN+Pl: прочитали

    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1: прочитаю
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2: прочитаешь
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3: прочитает
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1: прочитаем
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2: прочитаете
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3: прочитают
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Imp+Sg2: прочитай
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl2: прочитайте
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: прочитав
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прочитавши
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Inf: прочитать
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+Msc+Sg: прочитал
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+Neu+Sg: прочитало
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+Fem+Sg: прочитала
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+MFN+Pl: прочитали

    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1: прочитаю
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2: прочитаешь
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3: прочитает
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1: прочитаем
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2: прочитаете
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3: прочитают
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Imp+Sg2: прочитай
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl2: прочитайте
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: прочитав
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прочитавши
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавший
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: прочитавший
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: прочитавшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитавшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитавшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитавшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитавшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc: прочитавшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитавшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитавшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитавшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитавшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавшая
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc: прочитавшую
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom: прочитавшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc: прочитавшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc: прочитавших
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen: прочитавших
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc: прочитавших
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat: прочитавшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins: прочитавшими

    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавший
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: прочитавший
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: прочитавшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитавшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитавшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитавшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитавшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc: прочитавшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитавшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитавшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитавшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитавшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавшая
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc: прочитавшую
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитавшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom: прочитавшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc: прочитавшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc: прочитавших
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen: прочитавших
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc: прочитавших
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat: прочитавшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins: прочитавшими

    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитанный
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: прочитанный
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: прочитанного
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитанного
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитанном
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитанному
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитанным
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитанное
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc: прочитанное
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитанного
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитанном
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитанному
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитанным
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитанная
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc: прочитанную
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen: прочитанной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc: прочитанной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat: прочитанной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins: прочитанной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom: прочитанные
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc: прочитанные
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc: прочитанных
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen: прочитанных
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc: прочитанных
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat: прочитанным
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins: прочитанными
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Pred: прочитан
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Pred: прочитано
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Pred: прочитана
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+Pl+Pred: прочитаны

    
